Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-314
Loss of eligibility to vote; when; update voter registration record; when; change of residence within county; change of name or party affiliation; effect.

(1) Any person going into another territory or state and registering to vote or voting in that territory or state shall lose his or her eligibility to vote in this state. Any person going into another county of this state and registering to vote or voting in that county shall lose his or her eligibility to vote in the county where he or she was registered.

(2) A registered voter who changes his or her residence in one county to a residence address in a different county in the state shall register again or update his or her voter registration record in order to be eligible to vote.

(3) A registered voter who changes his or her name or residence within the county and has retained legal residence in the county since the date of his or her last registration shall register again or update his or her voter registration record to avoid additional requirements at the time of voting as provided in sections 32-914 and 32-915 and may be entitled to vote pursuant to section 32-914.01, 32-914.02, or 32-915.

(4) A registered voter who wants to change his or her party affiliation for purposes of a primary election shall complete a registration application pursuant to section 32-312.04 and submit it to the election commissioner or county clerk as provided in and prior to the deadline prescribed by section 32-302 or 32-321.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 76;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 35;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 17.